Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.011

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Advertisement" means all representations, other than those on the label, disseminated in any manner or by any means, relating to seed within the scope of this chapter.

(2) "Agricultural seed" includes grass, forage, cereal, oil, fiber, and other kinds of crop seeds commonly recognized within this state as agricultural seeds, lawn seeds, and combinations of such seeds, and may include common and restricted noxious weed seeds but not prohibited noxious weed seeds.

(3) "Blend" means seed consisting of more than one variety of a kind, each in excess of five percent by weight of the whole.

(4) "Bulk seed" means seed distributed in a nonpackage form.

(5) "Business licensing system" means the mechanism established by chapter 19.02 RCW by which business licenses, endorsed for individual state-issued licenses, are issued and renewed using a business license application and a business license expiration date common to each renewable license endorsement.

(6) "Certifying agency" means (a) an agency authorized under the laws of any state, territory, or possession to certify seed officially and which has standards and procedures approved by the United States secretary of agriculture to assure the genetic purity and identity of the seed certified; or (b) an agency of a foreign country determined by the United States secretary of agriculture to adhere to procedures and standards for seed certification comparable to those adhered to generally by seed-certifying agencies under (a) of this subsection.

(7) "Coated seed" means seed that has been treated and has received an application of inert material during the treatment process.

(8) "Conditioning" means drying, cleaning, scarifying, and other operations that could change the purity or germination of the seed and require the seed lot to be retested to determine the label information.

(9) "Dealer" means any person who distributes.

(10) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state of Washington or its duly authorized representative.

(11) "Director" means the director of the department of agriculture.

(12) "Distribute" means to import, consign, offer for sale, hold for sale, sell, barter, or otherwise supply seed in this state.

(13) "Flower seeds" includes seeds of herbaceous plants grown from their blooms, ornamental foliage, or other ornamental parts, and commonly known and sold under the name of flower seeds in this state.

(14) The terms "foundation seed," "registered seed," and "certified seed" mean seed that has been produced and labeled in compliance with the regulations of the department.

(15) "Germination" means the emergence and development from the seed embryo of those essential structures which, for the kind of seed in question, are indicative of the ability to produce a normal plant under favorable conditions.

(16) "Hard seeds" means seeds that remain hard at the end of the prescribed test period because they have not absorbed water due to an impermeable seed coat.

(17) "Hybrid" means the first generation seed of a cross produced by controlling the pollination and by combining (a) two or more inbred lines; (b) one inbred or a single cross with an open pollinated variety; or (c) two varieties or species, except open-pollinated varieties of corn (Zea mays). The second generation or subsequent generations from such crosses are not regarded as hybrids. Hybrid designations must be treated as variety names.

(18) "Inert matter" means all matter not seed, that includes broken seeds, sterile florets, chaff, fungus bodies, and stones as determined by methods defined by rule.

(19) "Inoculant" means a commercial preparation containing nitrogen fixing bacteria applied to the seed.

(20) "Kind" means one or more related species or subspecies that singly or collectively is known by one common name, for example, corn, oats, alfalfa, and timothy.

(21) "Label" includes a tag or other device attached to or written, stamped, or printed on any container or accompanying any lot of bulk seeds purporting to set forth the information required on the seed label by this chapter, and it may include any other information relating to the labeled seed.

(22) "Lot" means a definite quantity of seed identified by a lot number or other mark, every portion or bag of which is uniform within recognized tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.

(23) "Lot number" must identify the producer or dealer and year of production or the year distributed for each lot of seed. This requirement may be satisfied by use of a conditioner's or dealer's code.

(24) "Mixture," "mix," or "mixed" means seed consisting of more than one kind, each in excess of five percent by weight of the whole.

(25) "Official sample" means any sample of seed taken and designated as official by the department.

(26) "Other crop seed" means seed of plants grown as crops, other than the kind or variety included in the pure seed, as determined by methods defined by rule.

(27) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, company, association, receiver, trustee, or agent.

(28) "Prohibited (primary) noxious weed seeds" are the seeds of weeds which when established are highly destructive, competitive, and/or difficult to control by cultural or chemical practices.

(29) "Pure live seed" means the product of the percent of germination plus hard or dormant seed multiplied by the percent of pure seed divided by one hundred. The result is expressed as a whole number.

(30) "Pure seed" means seed exclusive of inert matter and all other seeds not of the seed being considered as determined by methods defined by rule.

(31) "Restricted (secondary) noxious weed seeds" are the seeds of weeds which are objectionable in fields, lawns, and gardens of this state, but which can be controlled by cultural or chemical practices.

(32) "Retail" means to distribute to the ultimate consumer.

(33) "Screenings" mean chaff, seed, weed seed, inert matter, and other materials removed from seed in cleaning or conditioning.

(34) "Seed labeling registrant" means a person who has obtained a permit to label seed for distribution in this state.

(35) "Seeds" mean agricultural or vegetable seeds or other seeds as determined by rules adopted by the department.

(36) "Stop sale, use, or removal order" means an administrative order restraining the sale, use, disposition, and movement of a specific amount of seed.

(37) "Treated" means that the seed has received an application of a substance, or that it has been subjected to a process for which a claim is made.

(38) "Type" means a group of varieties so nearly similar that the individual varieties cannot be clearly differentiated except under special conditions.

(39) "Variety" means a subdivision of a kind that is distinct, uniform, and stable; "distinct" in the sense that the variety can be differentiated by one or more identifiable morphological, physiological, or other characteristics from all other varieties of public knowledge; "uniform" in the sense that variations in essential and distinctive characteristics are describable; and "stable" in the sense that the variety will remain unchanged in its essential and distinctive characteristics and its uniformity when reproduced or reconstituted as required by the different categories of varieties.

(40) "Vegetable seeds" includes the seeds of those crops that are grown in gardens and on truck farms and are generally known and sold under the name of vegetable or herb seeds in this state.

(41) "Weed seeds" include the seeds of all plants generally recognized as weeds within this state, and includes the seeds of prohibited and restricted noxious weeds as determined by regulations adopted by the department.

[ 2013 c 144 s 5; 1989 c 354 s 73.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Effective date—1989 c 354 ss 70-81 and 84-86: See note following RCW 15.49.005.

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.